Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2322.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [144.0515] HEALTH CARE WORKFORCE ADVISORY COUNCIL. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin (a) The legislature has recognized the need for a body that has a comprehensive view of the health care workforce needs of the state, can advise the legislature on health care workforce issues, is a neutral convenor of competing perspectives, and is committed to working across all sectors to promote action toward resolving persistent health care workforce challenges. The Minnesota Health Care Workforce Advisory Council is established to: new text end new text begin (1) provide objective health care workforce research and data analysis; new text end new text begin (2) collaborate and coordinate with other entities on health care workforce policies; new text end new text begin (3) review, comment, and advise the legislature and other stakeholders on relevant workforce legislation for education, training, retention, diversity and demographics, changes in health care delivery, practice, and financing; and new text end new text begin (4) recommend appropriate public and private sector policies, programs, and other efforts to address identified health care workforce needs. new text end new text begin (b) The council shall consult and collaborate with other health care workforce planning entities, including but not limited to the governor's Workforce Development Board, area councils on graduate medical education, advisory committees that support health care workforce education and clinical training, health professional associations, licensing bodies, and certification and educational institutions in developing their program or legislative recommendations. new text end new text begin (c) The council shall focus on health care workforce supply, demand, and distribution; health equity; efforts to increase participation by those underrepresented in health professions education; education, training, and practice across oral health, behavioral health, pharmacy, nursing, primary and specialty care training and practice, allied health care, and direct care; and health care workforce data, evaluation, and analysis. new text end new text begin (d) The council shall establish discipline-, profession-, or issue-specific standing or ad hoc committees with subject matter experts to advise and support the work of the council. The council shall intentionally include perspectives that represent rural needs and workforce diversity in all committees. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin The Minnesota Health Care Workforce Advisory Council shall consist of 16 members appointed as follows: new text end new text begin (1) two members of the senate, one appointed by the majority leader and one appointed by the minority leader; new text end new text begin (2) two members of the house of representatives, one appointed by the speaker of the house and one appointed by the minority leader; new text end new text begin (3) the commissioner of employment and economic development or a designee; new text end new text begin (4) one member of the Office of Higher Education or a designee; and new text end new text begin (5) ten members appointed by the governor who have expertise regarding the council's priorities. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Appointments. new text end new text begin In making appointments to the council, the governor shall ensure geographic and demographic representation. Appointees shall demonstrate a commitment to the council's broader charge, proven experience in addressing health care workforce needs, and subject matter expertise that benefit the council's priorities. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Terms of public members; chair; compensation. new text end new text begin (a) The terms of the members appointed under subdivision 2 shall be four years, except for the initial appointment of the members appointed under subdivision 2, clause (5), for which the governor shall appoint five members appointed under subdivision 2, clause (5), to a two-year term. Members may serve until their successors are appointed. new text end new text begin (b) Initial appointments must be made by October 30, 2025. The commissioner of health shall convene the first meeting by January 5, 2026. The council shall elect a chair from among its members. new text end new text begin (c) Members other than the commissioners or designees may be removed according to section 15.059, subdivision 4. The members of the council shall receive no compensation other than reimbursement for expenses. Legislative members may receive per diem and be reimbursed for expenses according to the rules of their respective bodies. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Staffing. new text end new text begin (a) An executive director of the council shall be hired by the commissioner of health with advice from the council. The executive director of the council may offer advice to the governor on applicants seeking appointments to the council. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of health shall provide adequate staffing to the council and the committees to carry out the council's responsibilities, including administrative, research, planning, and strategy facilitation services. The commissioner shall provide comprehensive, nonpartisan, and methodologically rigorous data, research, and recommendations on health care workforce issues as requested by the council. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin The council, with staffing support from the commissioner of health, shall: new text end new text begin (1) regularly convene stakeholders from various groups across the state to identify and prioritize the pressing needs related to the health care workforce. The council may seek public input via town halls, listening sessions, or surveys. Issues may include but are not limited to health care workforce shortages, training and workforce supply needs, demographic and geographic distribution, retention, models of care that relate to health care access and equity, emerging health care professions and roles, and emerging health professional education programs and institutions; new text end new text begin (2) advise the legislature, educational institutions, the Office of Higher Education, relevant state agencies, and other stakeholders on current and proposed health care workforce initiatives, including training and pipeline development, workforce shortages and maldistribution, retention and burnout, evolving roles of health care providers, health equity, and geographic and demographic diversity in the workforce; new text end new text begin (3) consider objective, nonpartisan research and develop actionable recommendations regarding the following: new text end new text begin (i) health care workforce supply and demand, including: new text end new text begin (A) employment trends and demand across all professions, including but not limited to primary care, behavioral health, and oral health; new text end new text begin (B) strategies that entities in Minnesota or other states are using or may use to address health care workforce shortages, recruitment, and retention; and new text end new text begin (C) future investments to increase the supply of health care professionals, with particular focus on critical areas of need within Minnesota; new text end new text begin (ii) options for training and educating the health care workforce, including: new text end new text begin (A) increasing the diversity of health care workers to reflect Minnesota's communities; new text end new text begin (B) addressing the maldistribution of primary care, behavioral health, nursing, oral, and other providers in greater Minnesota and in underserved communities; new text end new text begin (C) increasing interprofessional training and clinical practice; new text end new text begin (D) addressing the need for sufficient quality faculty, preceptors, and supervisors to train a growing workforce; and new text end new text begin (E) developing advancement paths or career ladders for health care workers; new text end new text begin (iii) funding for strategies to diversify and address gaps in the health care workforce, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (A) increasing access to financing for graduate medical education that is responsive to state workforce needs; new text end new text begin (B) changes in practice scopes to address gaps in care; new text end new text begin (C) identifying future models of care delivery and future roles within the care delivery team that impact the workforce; new text end new text begin (D) expanding pathway programs and engaging the current health care workforce to increase awareness of health care professions among middle and high school, undergraduate, and community college students, particularly from communities that are underrepresented in the health care workforce; new text end new text begin (E) reducing or eliminating tuition for entry-level health care positions in high-demand settings; expanding other existing financial support programs such as loan forgiveness and scholarship programs, especially for underrepresented communities; and consider awarding credit for prior and noncredit learning; new text end new text begin (F) incentivizing recruitment into the health care field from greater Minnesota and underrepresented communities; new text end new text begin (G) incentivizing recruitment and retention for providers practicing in greater Minnesota and in underserved communities; and new text end new text begin (H) expanding existing programs, or investing in new programs, that provide wraparound support services to the existing health care workforce, especially People of Color and professionals from other underrepresented identities, to acquire training and advance within the health care workforce; and new text end new text begin (iv) other Minnesota health care workforce priorities as determined by the council; and new text end new text begin (4) submit a comprehensive five-year workforce plan to the legislature as defined in subdivision 7 and, as feasible, provide information and analysis on health care workforce needs and trends to the legislature, any state department, or any other workforce planning entity. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Workforce plan and reporting. new text end new text begin (a) Every five years the Minnesota Health Care Workforce Advisory Council shall develop health care workforce priorities to meet the workforce needs of the state and prepare a comprehensive health care workforce plan along with performance and progress metrics. The first plan must be submitted to the legislature by January 15, 2027, and an updated plan must be submitted every five years thereafter. The comprehensive health care workforce plan must include but is not limited to the following: new text end new text begin (1) an assessment of the current supply and distribution of health care providers in the state, trends in health care delivery and reform, and the effects of such trends on workforce needs; new text end new text begin (2) five-year projections of the demand and supply of health care workers to meet the needs of health care within the state; new text end new text begin (3) identification of all funding sources for which the state has administrative control that are available for health professions training and education, and how the funds are spent; and new text end new text begin (4) recommendations and action plans to meet the projected demand for health care workers over the five years of the plan. new text end new text begin (b) In the interim between the publication of comprehensive health care workforce plans, the commissioner of health, on behalf of the Minnesota Health Care Workforce Advisory Council, shall provide periodic updates to the governor on the performance metrics and the progress made toward achieving the goals as noted in the work plan and identify emerging needs. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Meetings. new text end new text begin Meetings of the council and its committees are subject to the open meeting law in chapter 13D. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The council expires on January 1, 2029. new text end